apertium-lat.lat.dix
    <pardef n="/qui__prn">
        <e><p><l>qui</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quae</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quod</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cuius</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cuius</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cuius</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cui</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cui</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cui</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quem</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quam</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quod</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quo</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>qua</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quo</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>qui</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quae</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quae</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quorum</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quarum</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quorum</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quos</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quas</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quae</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>qui</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quae</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quod</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cuius</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cuius</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cuius</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cui</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cui</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cui</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quem</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quam</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quod</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quo</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>qua</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quo</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>qui</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quae</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quae</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quorum</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quarum</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quorum</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quos</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quas</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quae</l>           <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>         <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>quibus</l>          <r>qui<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="qui"><i></i><par n="/qui__prn"/></e>
